liblouis-back-translation-tables/hi-in-g1-abk.utb
midendword \x090F 1-15
midendword \x0907 1-24
midendword \x0908 1-35
midendword \x0914 1-246
midendword \x0913 1-135
midendword \x093F\x0906 24-345
midendword \x093F\x090F 24-15
midendword \x093F\x0909 24-136
midendword \x093F\x090A 24-1256
midendword \x093F\x0913 24-135
midendword \x0941\x0907 136-24
midendword \x0941\x0906 136-345
midendword \x0941\x090F 136-15
midendword \x0941\x0913 136-135
midendword \x0942\x0907 1256-24
midendword \x0942\x0906 1256-345
midendword \x0942\x0913 1256-135
midendword \x0947\x0906 15-345
midendword \x0947\x0907 15-24
midendword \x0947\x0913 15-135
midendword \x094B\x0906 135-345
midendword \x094B\x0907 135-24
midendword \x094B\x0908 135-35
midendword \x094B\x090F 135-15
midendword \x093E\x0907 345-24
midendword \x093E\x0908 345-35
midendword \x093E\x0909 345-136
midendword \x093E\x090A 345-1256
midendword \x093E\x090F 345-15
midendword \x093E\x0913 345-135
midendword \x094C\x0906 246-345
midendword \x094C\x090F 246-15
midendword \x094C\x0913 246-135
sufword \x0906\x0907 345-24
sufword \x0906\x0908 345-35
sufword \x0906\x0909 345-136
sufword \x0906\x090A 345-1256
sufword \x0906\x090F 345-15
sufword \x0906\x0913 345-135
sufword \x0906\x0907\x090F 345-24-15


midendword \x093E\x0907\x090F 345-24-15
midendword \x094B\x0907\x090F 135-24-15

# Added for fixing ambiguity between math characters and letter KHA
always \x0916\x092C 46-12
always \x0916\x091A 46-14
always \x0916\x0926 46-145
always \x0916\x0947 46-15
always \x0916\x0917 46-1245
always \x0916\x0939 46-125
always \x0916\x093F 46-24
always \x0916\x091C 46-245
always \x0916\x0915 46-13
always \x0916\x092E 46-134
always \x0916\x091E 46-25
always \x0916\x0940 46-35
always \x0916\x091D 46-356

midendword \x0902 56

midendword \X0923 3456 #davanagari nna

midword \x091D 356
sufword \x091D 356

midword \x092B 235
sufword \x092B 235

# endword ." 256-356
endword \x0964\x0022 256-356 
endword \x002C\x0022 2-356
endword \x0021\x0022 235-356

endword \x0964 256

sufword \X0923 56-3456 #davanagari nna

include en-in-g1.ctb
